Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.49.040

Civil infraction, when.

Unlawful discharge of a laser in the first degree or second degree is a civil infraction if committed by a juvenile who has not before committed either offense. The monetary penalty imposed upon a juvenile may not exceed one hundred dollars.

[ 1999 c 180 s 5.]